dev/apertium-urd.urd.dix
    <pardef n="ب/یھجنا__vblex_caus2">
      <e><p>          <l>ھجوانا</l><r>یھجنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ھجوانے</l><r>یھجنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="inf"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ھجواؤں</l><r>یھجنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ھجوائیں</l><r>یھجنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ھجواؤں</l><r>یھجنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ھجوائیں</l><r>یھجنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ھجواؤ</l><r>یھجنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ھجواؤ</l><r>یھجنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ھجواؤ</l><r>یھجنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ھجواؤ</l><r>یھجنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ھجوا</l><r>یھجنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="cas"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ھجواؤ</l><r>یھجنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="cas"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ھجوا</l><r>یھجنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="cas"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ھجواؤ</l><r>یھجنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="cas"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ھجواؤ</l><r>یھجنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ھجوائیے</l><r>یھجنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ھجوائیں</l><r>یھجنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ھجوائیے</l><r>یھجنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ھجوائیں</l><r>یھجنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ھجواؤ</l><r>یھجنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ھجوائیے</l><r>یھجنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ھجوائیں</l><r>یھجنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ھجوائیے</l><r>یھجنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ھجوائیں</l><r>یھجنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ھجوائے</l><r>یھجنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="dst"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ھجوائیں</l><r>یھجنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="dst"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ھجوائے</l><r>یھجنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="dst"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ھجوائیں</l><r>یھجنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="dst"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ھجوائے</l><r>یھجنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="prx"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ھجوائیں</l><r>یھجنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="prx"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ھجوائے</l><r>یھجنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="prx"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ھجوائیں</l><r>یھجنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="prx"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ھجواتا</l><r>یھجنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ھجواتے</l><r>یھجنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ھجواتی</l><r>یھجنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ھجواتیں</l><r>یھجنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ھجواتے</l><r>یھجنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ھجواتے</l><r>یھجنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ھجواتی</l><r>یھجنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ھجواتیں</l><r>یھجنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ھجواتیں</l><r>یھجنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ھجواتا</l><r>یھجنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="cas"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ھجواتے</l><r>یھجنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="cas"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ھجواتی</l><r>یھجنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="cas"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ھجواتیں</l><r>یھجنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="cas"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ھجواتے</l><r>یھجنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ھجواتے</l><r>یھجنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ھجواتی</l><r>یھجنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ھجواتیں</l><r>یھجنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ھجواتیں</l><r>یھجنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ھجواتا</l><r>یھجنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="dst"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ھجواتے</l><r>یھجنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="dst"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ھجواتی</l><r>یھجنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="dst"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ھجواتیں</l><r>یھجنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="dst"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ھجواتا</l><r>یھجنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="prx"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ھجواتے</l><r>یھجنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="prx"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ھجواتی</l><r>یھجنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="prx"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

    <e lm="بیھجنا"><i>ب</i><par n="ب/یھجنا__vblex_caus2"/></e>
